North Carolina, session 2025, HB667.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-143.1 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i1) A person who was lawfully admitted to this State or is lawfully present in this State
and meets all of the following requirements is eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate:
(1) Has a parent or legal guardian who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Was lawfully admitted to the United States or is lawfully present in
the United States.
b. Is not a citizen of the United States.
c. Holds a valid H-1B visa or L-1 visa.
(2) Meets all of the following criteria:
a. Either of the following:
1. Holds a valid H4 visa.
2. All of the following:
*H667-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
I. Is continuously enrolled at an institution of higher
education, including any approved leave of absence
from the institution.
II. Held a valid H4 visa at some point during the period of
continuous enrollment.
III. Was classified as a resident for tuition purposes at some
point during the period of continuous enrollment.
b. Establishes domicile in this State under this section."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 academic year.
Page 2 House Bill 667-First Edition